Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 7. Rules of Construction Applicable Only to Wills.

Collateral references. —

Child or children in will as including grandchild or grandchildren. 30 ALR4th 319.

What passes under term “personal property” in will. 31 ALR5th 499.

Sec. 13.12.601.
Scope.

Except as provided in AS

13.06.068

, in the absence of a finding of a contrary intention, the rules of construction in AS

13.12.601

—

13.12.609

control the construction of a will.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.12.602.
Will may pass all property and after-acquired property.

A will may provide for the passage of all property the testator owns at death and all property acquired by the estate after the testator’s death.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.603.
Antilapse; deceased devisee; class gifts.

If a devisee fails to survive the testator and is a grandparent, a descendant of a grandparent, or a stepchild of either the testator or the donor of a power of appointment exercised by the testator’s will, the following apply:

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the devise is not in the form of a class gift and the deceased devisee leaves surviving descendants, a substitute gift is created in the devisee’s surviving descendants; the surviving descendants take by representation the property to which the devisee would have been entitled had the devisee survived the testator;

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the devise is in the form of a class gift, other than a devise to “issue,” “descendants,” “heirs of the body,” “heirs,” “next of kin,” “relatives,” or “family,” or a class described by language of similar import, a substitute gift is created in the surviving descendants of a deceased devisee; the property to which the devisees would have been entitled had all of them survived the testator passes to the surviving devisees and the surviving descendants of the deceased devisees; each surviving devisee takes the share to which the surviving devisee would have been entitled had the deceased devisees survived the testator; each deceased devisee’s surviving descendants who are substituted for the deceased devisee take by representation the share to which the deceased devisee would have been entitled had the deceased devisee survived the testator;

for the purposes of AS

13.12.601

, words of survivorship, as in a devise to an individual “if the individual survives me,” or in a devise to “my surviving children,” are not, in the absence of additional evidence, a sufficient indication of an intent contrary to the application of this section;

if the will creates an alternative devise with respect to a devise for which a substitute gift is created by (1) or (2) of this subsection, the substitute gift is superseded by the alternative devise only if an expressly designated devisee of the alternative devise is entitled to take under the will;

unless the language creating a power of appointment expressly excludes the substitution of the descendants of an appointee for the appointee, a surviving descendant of a deceased appointee of a power of appointment can be substituted for the appointee under this section, whether or not the descendant is an object of the power.

If, under (a) of this section, substitute gifts are created and not superseded with respect to more than one devise and the devises are alternative devises, one to the other, the determination of which of the substitute gifts takes effect is resolved as follows:

except as provided in (2) of this subsection, the devised property passes under the primary substitute gift;

if there is a younger-generation devise, the devised property passes under the younger-generation substitute gift and not under the primary substitute gift.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

In this section,

“alternative devise” means a devise that is expressly created by the will and, under the terms of the will, can take effect instead of another devise on the happening of one or more events, including survival of the testator or failure to survive the testator, whether an event is expressed in condition-precedent, condition-subsequent, or other form; a residuary clause constitutes an alternative devise with respect to a nonresiduary devise only if the will specifically provides that, upon lapse or failure, the nonresiduary devise, or nonresiduary devises in general, pass under the residuary clause;

“class member” includes an individual who fails to survive the testator but who would have taken under a devise in the form of a class gift had the individual survived the testator;

“deceased devisee” means a class member who failed to survive the testator and left one or more surviving descendants;

“devise” includes an alternative devise, a devise in the form of a class gift, and an exercise of a power of appointment;

“devisee” includes

a class member if the devise is in the form of a class gift;

an individual or class member who was deceased at the time the testator executed the testator’s will as well as an individual or class member who was then living but who failed to survive the testator; and

an appointee under a power of appointment exercised by the testator’s will;

“primary devise” means the devise that would have taken effect had all the deceased devisees of the alternative devises who left surviving descendants survived the testator;

“primary substitute gift” means the substitute gift created with respect to a primary devise;

“stepchild” means a child of the surviving, deceased, or former spouse of the testator or of the donor of a power of appointment, and not of the testator or donor;

“surviving devisee” or “surviving descendant” means a devisee or a descendant who neither predeceases the testator nor is considered to have predeceased the testator under AS

13.12.702

;

“testator” includes the donee of a power of appointment if the power is exercised in the testator’s will;

“younger-generation devise” means a devise that

is to a descendant of a devisee of a primary devise;

is an alternative devise with respect to the primary devise;

is a devise for which a substitute gift is created; and

would have taken effect had all the deceased devisees who left surviving descendants survived the testator except the deceased devisee or devisees of the primary devise;

“younger-generation substitute gift” means a substitute gift created with respect to a younger-generation devise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§
41, 42, 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

The paragraphs in subsection (d) were renumbered in 2019 to maintain the definitions in alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a)(2), deleted, “In this paragraph, “deceased devisee” means a class member who failed to survive the testator and left one or more surviving descendants;” at the end; repealed (c); added (d)(8) through (12) [now (d)(3), (d)(6), (d)(7), (d)(11) and (d)(12)].

Sec. 13.12.604.
Failure of testamentary provision.

Except as provided in AS

13.12.603

, a devise, other than a residuary devise, that fails for any reason becomes a part of the residue.

Except as provided in AS

13.12.603

, if the residue is devised to two or more persons, the share of a residuary devisee that fails for any reason passes to the other residuary devisee, or to other residuary devisees in proportion to the interest of each in the remaining part of the residue.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.605.
Increase in securities; accessions.

If a testator executes a will that devises securities and the testator then owned securities that meet the description in the will, the devise includes additional securities that are owned by the testator at death to the extent the additional securities were acquired by the testator after the will was executed as a result of the testator’s ownership of the described securities and that are securities of

the same organization acquired by reason of action initiated by the organization or a successor, related, or acquiring organization, excluding securities acquired by exercise of purchase options;

another organization acquired as a result of a merger, consolidation, reorganization, or other distribution by the organization or a successor, related, or acquiring organization; or

the same organization acquired as a result of a plan of reinvestment.

Distributions in cash before death with respect to a described security are not part of the devise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.606.
Nonademption of specific devises.

A specific devisee has a right to the specifically devised property in the testator’s estate at death and

any amount of a condemnation award for the taking of the property unpaid at death;

any proceeds unpaid at death on fire or casualty insurance on or other recovery for injury to the property; and

property owned by the testator at death and acquired as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security interest for the specifically devised obligation.

If specifically devised property is sold or mortgaged by a conservator or by an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or if a condemnation award, insurance proceeds, or recovery for injury to the property are paid to a conservator or to an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, the specific devisee has the right to a general pecuniary devise equal to the net sale price, the amount of the unpaid loan, the condemnation award, the insurance proceeds, or the recovery.

The right of a specific devisee under (b) of this section is reduced by any right the devisee has under (a) of this section.

For the purposes of the references in (b) of this section to a conservator, (b) of this section does not apply if after the sale, mortgage, condemnation, casualty, or recovery, it was adjudicated that the testator’s incapacity ceased and the testator survived the adjudication by one year.

For the purposes of the references in (b) of this section to an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal,

“incapacitated principal” means a principal who is an incapacitated person;

adjudication of incapacity before death is not necessary; and

the acts of an agent within the authority of a durable power of attorney are presumed to be for an incapacitated principal.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2000)

Sec. 13.12.607.
Nonexoneration.

A specific devise passes subject to any mortgage interest existing at the date of death, without right of exoneration, regardless of a general directive in the will to pay debts.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.608.
Exercise of power of appointment.

In the absence of a requirement that a power of appointment be exercised by a reference, or by an express or specific reference, to the power, a general residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all of the testator’s property, expresses an intention to exercise a power of appointment held by the testator only if

the power is a general power and the creating instrument does not contain a gift if the power is not exercised; or

the testator’s will manifests an intention to include the property subject to the power.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.609.
Ademption by satisfaction.

Property a testator gave in the testator’s lifetime to a person is treated as a satisfaction of a devise in whole or in part, only if

the will provides for deduction of the gift;

the testator declared in a contemporaneous writing that the gift is in satisfaction of the devise or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the devise; or

the devisee acknowledged in writing that the gift is in satisfaction of the devise or that its value is to be deducted from the value of the devise.

For purposes of partial satisfaction, property given during lifetime is valued as of the time the devisee came into possession or enjoyment of the property or at the testator’s death, whichever occurs first.

If the devisee fails to survive the testator, the gift is treated as a full or partial satisfaction of the devise, as appropriate, in applying AS

13.12.603

and

13.12.604

, unless the testator’s contemporaneous writing provides otherwise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)